en: lepidium peruvianum, peruvian ginseng
cs: Řeřicha peruánská
fa: جینسنگ پرویی
hr: lepidium Peruvianum, Lepidium Peruvianum Chacon
it: lepidium peruvianum
lt: Peruvinė pipirnė
ru: Мака перуанская
sk: Žerucha peruánska
sr: Peruanska maka
uk: Мака перуанська

en: ginseng
xx: ginseng
bg: женшен
de: Ginseng
fr: gingseng
pl: żeńszeń, żeń-szeń, żeń-szenia, żeńszenia

en: ginseng root extract
fr: extrait de racine de ginseng

en: American ginseng
la: Panax quinquefolius

en: Korean ginseng, Asian ginseng
la: Panax ginseng

en: Korean ginseng root extract
de: Panax ginseng Wurzelextrakt
fi: panax ginseng-juuriuute
fr: extrait de racine de panax ginseng
hr: ekstrakt korijena panaks ginsenga, panax ginseng
it: estratto di radice di Panax ginseng
ru: экстракт женьшеня
sv: panax ginseng rotextrakt

en: Siberian ginseng
la: Eleutherococcus senticosus

en: liquorice, licorice
af: Soethout
ar: عرقسوس
az: Şirinbiyan
ba: Татлы тамыр
bg: женско биле
bo: ཤིང་མངར།
bs: Sladić
ca: regalèssia
cs: lékořice lysá
cy: Gwylys
da: lakrids, Glat Lakrids
de: Lakritz, Sussholz, Süßholz, Echtes Süßholz
dv: ވޭމުއި
el: Γλυκόριζα
eo: Vera glicirizo
es: regaliz
et: lagrits, Lagritsa-magusjuur
eu: Erregaliz
fa: شیرین‌بیان
fi: lakritsi, lakritsikasvi
fr: réglisse, Infusions de Réglisse
ga: Liocras
gl: Regalicia
he: שוש קירח
hi: यष्टिमधु
hr: slatki korijen
hu: Igazi édesgyökér
hy: քաղցրարմատ
id: Akar manis
io: Regoliso
is: Lakkrísrót
it: liquirizia
ja: スペインカンゾウ
ka: ძირტკბილა
kk: Қызылмия
kn: ಅತಿಮಧುರ
ko: 민감초
ku: Sûs
la: Glycyrrhiza glabra
lb: Séissholz
lt: Paprastasis saldymedis
lv: lakrica
ml: ഇരട്ടിമധുരം
mr: ज्येष्ठमध
ms: Akar manis
nb: lakrisplante
ne: जेठी मधु
nl: zoethout
oc: Regalícia
pa: ਮੁਲ੍ਹਠੀ
pl: Lukrecja, lukrecji, lukrecjowe, lukrecjowy, lukrecjowa
pt: alcaçuz
ro: Lemn dulce
ru: лакрица
sa: यष्टी
sh: Sladić
sl: Golostebelni sladki koren
sr: Сладић
sv: lakrits
ta: அதிமதுரம்
te: అతిమధురము
th: ชะเอมเทศ
tl: Likorisa
tr: Meyan
uk: локриця
uz: Qizilmiya
zh: 光果甘草

en: organic liquorice
de: Bio-Lakritz
es: regaliz orgánico
fi: luomulakritsi, luomu lakritsi
fr: réglisse bio
hr: organski sladić
it: liquirizia biologica
nl: biologisch zoethout

en: liquorice extract
da: lakridsekstrakt
de: Lakritz extrakt, Süßholzextrakt
es: extracto de regaliz
fi: lakritsiuute, lakritsiuutetta
fr: extrait de réglisse
hr: ekstrakt sladića
it: estratto di liquirizia
nb: lakrisekstrakt
nl: Zoethoutextract
pt: extrato de alcaçuz, extracto de alcaçuz
sv: lakritsextrakt, lakritsexstrakt

en: liquorice root, licorice root
da: lakridsrod
de: Sussholzwurzel, Sußholzwurzel, Süßholzwurzel, Süssholzwurzel
fi: lakritsijuuri, lakritsanjuuri
fr: racine de réglisse
hr: korijen sladića
it: radice di liquirizia
nb: lakrisrot
nl: Zoethoutwortel
sv: lakritsrot

en: liquorice root extract
da: lakridsrodsekstrakt
de: Süßholzwurzelextrakt
es: extracto de raíz de regaliz
fi: lakritsijuuriuute
fr: Extrait de racine de réglisse
hr: ekstrakt korijena sladića
it: estratto di radice di liquirizia
nl: zoethoutwortelextract

en: liquorice powder
de: Süßholzpulver, Süßholzsaftpulver, Lakritzpulver
fi: lakritsijauhe
fr: Poudre de réglisse
hr: prah sladića
it: polvere di liquirizia
nl: zoethoutpoeder
sv: lakritspulver

en: liquorice dragées
de: Lakritzdragees, Lakritzdragées, Süßholzdragees
fi: lakritsirae
hr: dražeje od sladića
it: dragées alla liquirizia
sv: lakritsdragé

en: liquorice paste
fi: lakritsipasta
hr: pasta od sladića
it: pasta di liquirizia
sv: lakritspasta

en: mallow
de: Malve
fr: mauve
hr: sljez
it: malva

en: common mallow
it: malva comune
la: malva sylvestris

en: marsh-mallow
es: altea, bismalva, hierba cañamera
fr: guimauve officinale, mauve blanche
hr: bijeli slez
la: althaea officinalis
tr: hatmi çiçeği

en: marshmallow, mini marshmallow
de: Marshmallow
es: malvavisco
fr: guimauve
hr: marshmallow
it: marshmallow, Toffolette
nl: Marshmallow

en: marshmallow paste
hr: pasta od mliješnjaka
it: pasta di altea